Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1717
Other filings not required; not treated as a security.

(1) Any time-share program registered with the commission in which a public-offering statement has been prepared does not require registration under any other state statute.

(2) Any time-share program that fails to restrict the price at which an owner may sell or exchange his or her time-share interval shall not by virtue of such failure cause the time-share interval to become a security under the Securities Act of Nebraska nor shall an exchange agent offering such a time-share interval for exchange be construed to be offering a security under such act.

Laws 1980, LB 945, § 17.

Securities Act of Nebraska, see section 8-1123.